North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 31A. The North Carolina Collaboratory.

§ 116-255.
The North Carolina Collaboratory established.

Collaboratory Established. — There is established the North Carolina Collaboratory (Collaboratory) to facilitate the dissemination of the policy and research expertise of The University of North Carolina and other institutions of higher education within North Carolina for practical use by State and local governments. The Collaboratory shall be housed at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.

Duties and Powers. — The Collaboratory shall do at least the following within the funds available:

Conduct, manage, or participate in research on natural resources management, including, but not limited to, research related to the environmental and economic components of the management of the natural resources within the State of North Carolina and of new technologies for habitat, environmental, and water quality improvements.

Conduct, manage, or participate in other projects and opportunities, including, but not limited to, research that may be of interest to citizens and policymakers within the State.

Support research programs at institutions of higher education, particularly institutions identified as historically minority-serving institutions, within the Collaboratory’s areas of focus and expertise.

Identify, pursue, and support research and development opportunities through technology research and development, including, but not limited to, funding opportunities and partnerships between institutions of higher education, government agencies, nonprofit organizations, and both private and public businesses.

Develop and disseminate relevant best practices to interested parties, lead or participate in projects across the State, and make policy, research, funding, and other recommendations to the General Assembly.

Maintain an online reporting portal, in partnership with the Office of State Fire Marshal, on the storage and deployment of Aqueous Film-Forming Foams (AFFF) as required by G.S. 58-82B-10.

Teach and train students and faculty to engage in and administer neutral and unbiased research and advice on science policy through (i) informal workshops and similar events and (ii) formal development and delivery of curriculum.

Funding Conditions and Restrictions. — The following applies to funding received by the Collaboratory:

In disseminating State funds, the Collaboratory may give funding preference to constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, wherever possible.

Funds appropriated by the General Assembly and used by the Collaboratory may not be used for indirect overhead costs at an institution partnering with the Collaboratory.

For research or investigations that need to be carried out expeditiously in response to a project, opportunity, or a legislative mandate, the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes,

G.S. 143-129

, and

G.S. 116-31.10

shall not apply to the Collaboratory for the purchase of apparatus, supplies, material, services, or equipment in projects addressing an emerging or immediate threat to public health, safety, or welfare. For each project that utilizes this exemption, the Collaboratory shall provide a justification in writing and make this document available on its website for the duration of the project.

All units of State and local government shall cooperate and assist the Collaboratory with its research program by providing reasonable access to at least the following:

Infrastructure.

Personnel.

Data.

The Collaboratory may allocate funds to units of State and local government, as necessary, for purposes of facilitating compliance with subdivision (4) of this subsection.

History.

2021-180, s. 8.8(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.8, made this Article, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.8(b), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 11.8, as amended by Session Laws 2020-74, s. 8(c), and as amended by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.8(a), provides: “Beginning with the 2021-2022 fiscal year, the one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds appropriated in this act to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina for the 2016-2017 fiscal year to establish and operate a North Carolina Policy Collaboratory at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill shall be used, in addition to any other funds appropriated for this purpose, to establish and operate the North Carolina Collaboratory pursuant to Article 31A of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.9(a), (b), provides: “(a) The North Carolina Collaboratory (Collaboratory), established pursuant to Article 31A of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes, shall establish a research grant program for the following constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina identified as Historically Minority-Serving Institutions (HMSIs): Elizabeth City State University, Fayetteville State University, North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, North Carolina Central University, the University of North Carolina at Pembroke, and Winston-Salem State University. The Collaboratory shall establish an application process and criteria for research grants that include a focus on areas within the Collaboratory's mission of facilitating research related to the environmental and economic components of the management of the natural resources within the State and of new technologies for habitat, environmental, and water quality improvements and other areas of public health.

“The Collaboratory may award one or more research grants each fiscal year to each of the six HMSI constituent institutions to be used to expand their research capacity while being in service to the needs of the State. Of the funds appropriated by this act for the research grant program, the Collaboratory shall determine the amount of the research grant for each HMSI constituent institution in a fiscal year.

“(b) Funds allocated to the Collaboratory for the research grant program shall not be used to cover the administrative costs for the Collaboratory. Any unexpended funds appropriated for the research grant program at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes of this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8.10(a)-(g), as amended by Session Laws 2021-189, s. 2.3, provides: “(a) The North Carolina Collaboratory (Collaboratory) shall continue to identify faculty expertise, technology, and instrumentation located within institutions of higher education in the State, including East Carolina University, the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, the University of North Carolina at Charlotte, the University of North Carolina at Wilmington, North Carolina State University, North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University, Duke University, and other public and private institutions within the State and coordinate these faculty, technology, instrumentation, and other resources to do the following:

“(1) Conduct both targeted and nontargeted analysis for per- and poly-fluoroalkyl substances (PFAS), including the chemical known as "GenX," through a continuation of the North Carolina PFAS Testing Network (Network).

“(2) With respect to PFAS, including GenX, conduct (i) statewide water sampling, testing, and monitoring, (ii) statewide air sampling, testing, and monitoring, (iii) toxicology work in cellular and mammalian models, as well as monitoring levels and health effects of the citizens of North Carolina, and (iv) data management, analysis, and dissemination.

“(3) Develop and deploy technologies to mitigate exposure to PFAS, including GenX, and health impacts from such exposure.

“(4) Evaluate and pursue other research opportunities with respect to PFAS, including GenX, using relevant faculty expertise, technology, and instrumentation.

“The Collaboratory shall utilize the faculty and staff at the University of North Carolina at Wilmington for assisting with project management of the requirements set forth in subsections (a) through (e) of this section.

“(b) The Collaboratory shall continue to report the results of sampling conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to the Environmental Review Commission, the Department of Environmental Quality, the Department of Health and Human Services, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and the public through the Network's website.

“(c) Of the funds appropriated by this act to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina to be allocated to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill for the Collaboratory, the sum of fourteen million one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($14,150,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2021-2022 fiscal year shall be used by the Collaboratory to manage and implement the requirements of subsections (a) through (e) of this section, which shall include distribution to the Collaboratory (i) to cover costs incurred as a result of these activities, (ii) for acquisition or modification of essential scientific instrumentation and maintenance, and (iii) for payments of costs for sample collection and analysis, training or hiring of research staff and other personnel, method development activities, and data management, including dissemination of relevant data to stakeholders. Participating institutions receiving any funds under this subsection may not use any of the funds for overhead or other indirect costs. Funds allocated under this subsection shall not revert but shall remain available for nonrecurring expenditures. The provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes,

G.S. 116-31.10

,

G.S. 143-129

, and other relevant policies and guidelines related to those provisions shall not apply to the purchase of apparatus, supplies, material, personnel, contract, or equipment with any of the funds allocated under this section.

“(d) Of the funds allocated under subsection (c) of this section, a minimum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be directed to development within The University of North Carolina of a technology, or technologies, that utilizes water filtration or other chemical or physical technologies to remove or mitigate the presence of PFAS, including GenX, from water supplies where it is present. The technology shall be developed so that it can be deployed at three separate water supply locations at which analytical data demonstrates that PFAS contamination exists in order to test the efficacy of the technology, or technologies, as follows: (i) a publicly owned water treatment plant that provides drinking water from the Cape Fear River, (ii) a publicly owned wastewater treatment plant that discharges into the Cape Fear River, or a surface water body that flows into the Cape Fear River, and (iii) a location in either the Castle Hayne or the PeeDee aquifer that is utilized for drinking water. Each of these three sites shall be selected by the Collaboratory in consultation with faculty and staff from institutions of higher education in the State identified by the Collaboratory pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. All units of State and local government shall cooperate and assist with the placement, integration, operation, testing, and assessment of technology, or technologies, developed and deployed for the duration of any pilot testing authorized and funded under subsection (a) of this section.

“(e) The Collaboratory should continue to pursue relevant public and private funding opportunities that may be available to address the impacts of PFAS, including GenX, on surface water, groundwater, and air quality in order to leverage funds allocated under subsection (a) of this section or any other funds provided to the Collaboratory.

“(f) It is the intent of the General Assembly that funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Environmental Quality for personnel to map emerging compounds and to establish an Emerging Compounds unit within the Department will be expended synergistically with the funds allocated under subsection (a) of this section to comprehensively address the impacts of PFAS contamination on citizens of the State.

“(g) The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill shall apportion all gross revenue associated with any intellectual property, including licensing fees and patenting revenue, related to ionic fluorogel water filtration or other chemical or physical technologies developed utilizing research funds that are provided by the Collaboratory, which were allocated pursuant to this section, under the following formula:

“(1) Ten percent (10%) to the General Fund.

“(2) Forty percent (40%) to the inventor or inventors of such technologies.

“(3) Fifty percent (50%) to the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill to be divided as follows: (i) two-fifths into a general patent/licensure fund to be used at the constituent institution's discretion, (ii) two-fifths to the home academic department or department of the inventor or inventors of such technologies, and (iii) one-fifth to the Collaboratory to fund ongoing PFAS-related research and technology development.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.10(i), provides: “The Collaboratory, in partnership with the Office of the State Fire Marshal (OSFM) and any unit of State and local government deemed relevant by the Collaboratory, shall develop and maintain the online reporting portal as required by G.S. 58-82B-10, as enacted by subsection (h) of this section, and G.S. 116-255(b)(6), as enacted by Section 8.8 of this act. The portal shall consist of an online reporting tool and related database that captures the storage and deployment of Aqueous Film-Forming Foams (AFFF) by fire departments in the State that are operated, managed, or overseen by units of local government, including those located at or serving public airports. The reporting tool shall be easily accessible to firefighters and fire department personnel to upload the data. The required inventory data shall include, at a minimum, the following:

“(1) The number of trucks at each department that carry AFFF and the volume, trade name, and Chemical Abstract Service (CAS) number of the AFFF on each truck.

“(2) The fire station, including street address, where each truck is located.

“(3) The volume, trade name, and CAS number of AFFF stored by each fire department or unit of local government at a station or other location, as well as the address of each location where AFFF are stored.

“(4) The volume, trade name, and CAS number of AFFF products that are no longer utilized and could be removed from inventory for disposal.

“(5) The volume of AFFF used by each fire department annually, including all of the following:

“a. The date, time, and location, including street address and GPS coordinates, where AFFF was deployed, and the trade name and CAS number of the AFFF used.

“b. The total volume of AFFF deployed, including gallons of foam and gallons of water and total concentration of foam.

“c. The reason for the deployment of AFFF, such as firefighting, fire prevention, other emergency response actions intended to protect property or public safety, training, or an accidental spill.

“(6) A photograph of the label and the container of the foam. For the purpose of this subdivision, a photograph includes an electronic image produced by the camera of an electronic device.

“(7) Any other data deemed relevant by the Collaboratory to establish a statewide inventory of AFFF used for fighting fires or firefighter training.

“OSFM and all units of local government shall provide any information or assistance requested by the Collaboratory to acquire, compile, manage, interpret, and maintain the data required by this section. The tool and database required by this section shall be online and operational no later than January 1, 2023.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.11(a), (b), provides: “(a) In advance of the twenty-fifth anniversary of North Carolina's Fisheries Reform Act of 1997 and the fiftieth anniversary of North Carolina's Coastal Area Management Act, the North Carolina Collaboratory (Collaboratory) shall conduct a study on the overall status of the coastal and marine fisheries regulated by the State. The study shall focus on the following regulated species, including the health and extent of the habitats required by these species:

“(1) Bay Scallop.

“(2) Blue Crab.

“(3) Eastern Oyster.

“(4) Estuarine Striped Bass.

“(5) Hard Clam.

“(6) Kingfishes.

“(7) Red Drum.

“(8) River Herring.

“(9) Sheepshead.

“(10) Shrimp.

“(11) Southern Flounder.

“(12) Spotted Seatrout.

“(13) Striped Mullet.

“The Collaboratory shall analyze trends through time spanning the last few decades or longer to assess and develop policy recommendations to better manage the overall health and viability of the State's fisheries and fisheries' habitats. The Department of Environmental Quality, the Wildlife Resources Commission, other agencies of the State, and units of local government shall provide any assistance requested by the Collaboratory to acquire and compile data and complete the study required by this section. The Collaboratory shall provide the results of this study to the Environmental Review Commission no later than June 30, 2023.

“(b) In its expenditure of the one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds appropriated in this act for the 2021-2022 fiscal year to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina and allocated to the Collaboratory for research projects, the Collaboratory shall prioritize funding for the study of the coastal and marine fisheries of the State described in subsection (a) of this section. These funds shall not revert to the General Fund at the end of the 2021-2022 fiscal year but shall remain available until the end of the 2022-2023 fiscal year.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.18(a), (b), provides: “(a) Findings. – The General Assembly finds it is in the best interests of the State, upon consideration of bids and proposals by any agencies of the State bound by the North Carolina Administrative Code on procurement, to remediate and prevent cyanobacterial harmful algal blooms in the lakes and reservoirs of North Carolina by selecting an in situ treatment of the nutrient impaired surface waters in lakes and reservoirs through giving preference to those vendors who comply with the following specifications, which is to be considered as constituting the best practices for cyanobacterial harmful algal bloom remediation and prevention in North Carolina waters:

“(1) The technology employed must be approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency and certified to meet or exceed The American National Standards for health effects of drinking water treatment chemicals (NSF/ANSI/CAN 60) and be registered for application by the State.

“(2) A vendor must have previous experience treating water bodies larger than 1,000 acres with proven success in the United States.

“(3) A treatment aim must be to reduce cyanotoxins in the water to less than harmful levels.

“(4) A treatment technology employed must be ready to use without limitation of size or shape of the waterbody.

“(5) A preference must be given to employment of technology allowing for application under emergency situations and within less than 96 hours from approval.

“(6) A preference must be given to products that are modular and can be used as a preventative measure.

“(7) A preference must be given to products that are quick and easy to apply and are safe to the applicator.

“(8) A preference must be given to products that float on the surface of the water and do not sink immediately to the bottom of the water column and are not diminished in effectiveness by mixing with sediment.

“(9) A preference must be given to products that are distributed autonomously across the water body after a localized application.

“(10) A preference must be given to products with a time release mechanism that applies constant and prolonged oxidative stress of the cyanobacteria triggered by the programmed cell death signaling cascade resulting in their collapse.

“(11) A preference must be given for products manufactured in the United States.

“(b) The North Carolina Policy Collaboratory at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill (Collaboratory) shall evaluate the effectiveness and efficacy of an approved in situ treatment of the nutrient impaired surface waters in lakes and reservoirs on cyanobacterial harmful algal blooms under subsection (a) of this section. The Collaboratory shall report the results of the evaluation no later than April 1, 2023, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources; the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources; and the Fiscal Research Division.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8.26(a)-(g), provides: “(a) The following definitions apply in this section:

“(1) Highly treated wastewater. – Effluent discharged from a wastewater system that is designed and operated to meet the following standards:

“a. With respect to the carbonaceous biological oxygen demand (CBOD5), 10mg/L.

“b. With respect to NH3, 10mg/L.

“c. With respect to total nitrogen, 10mg/L, or a minimum of sixty percent (60%) reduction from the influent total Kjeldahl nitrogen.

“d. With respect to total phosphorus, 5mg/L, unless discharged into nutrient sensitive waters.

“e. With respect to fecal coliforms, 10 colonies/100mL.

“f. Capture and removal of residual sludge and biogases.

“g. With respect to total suspended solids, less than or equal to 10mg/L.

“(2) Wastewater system. – Defined in

G.S. 130A-334

.

“(b) Funds allocated from the State Fiscal Recovery Fund to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina for the Innovative Highly Treated Wastewater Pilot Program (Program) shall be provided to the North Carolina Policy Collaboratory at the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill (Collaboratory) to establish the Program as described in this subsection. The Collaboratory may use up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the funds allocated by this subsection for research and administrative costs related to the Program, of which up to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) may be used to reimburse the Department of Environmental Quality for its administrative costs. Project funding from the funds allocated by this section is limited to the lesser of forty percent (40%) of the total project cost or four million dollars ($4,000,000). In implementing the Program, the Collaboratory shall do the following:

“(1) Review and evaluate wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater, either as a single unit or as a combination of treatment devices for suitability as a wastewater treatment option for local governments, sanitary districts, or public authorities considered distressed, as defined by

G.S. 159G-20

, that (i) have no more than 10,000 customers or (ii) include residential or commercial developments or subdivisions that are unable to be served by existing wastewater systems.

“(2) Identify no less than five local governments, sanitary districts, or public authorities meeting the criteria set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection as participants in the Program.

“(3) Work with Program participants to submit permit applications to the Department of Environmental Quality and, upon permit approval, to construct the wastewater systems.

“(4) Conduct research and monitoring to quantify the efficacy of the wastewater systems funded and built as part of the Program. The Collaboratory shall share results of this research with Program participants and the Department.

“(c) The Department of Environmental Quality shall do the following with respect to entities receiving wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater under subsection (b) of this section to the extent not inconsistent with its National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permitting authority delegated from the United States Environmental Protection Agency:

“(1) Review and qualify wastewater systems producing highly treated wastewater, either as a single unit or as a combination of treatment devices. The Department shall require the manufacturer of the wastewater system within five days of the qualification under this subdivision to file with the Department a performance bond or other surety with a minimum term of five years to be executed in favor of the permittee in the amount sufficient to cover system replacement. Operation, maintenance, abuse, or change in hydraulic flows or wastewater characteristics shall not be attached to the performance bond or surety.

“(2) Work with the entities identified under subsection (b) of this section to permit the wastewater systems meeting the standards for highly treated wastewater set forth in subsection (a) of this section. The system must be consistent with the action plan developed by the entities as set forth in G.S. 159G-45(b)(3).

“(d) No later than December 1, 2024, the Collaboratory, with the assistance of the Department of Environmental Quality, shall provide a report to the Environmental Management Commission and the Environmental Review Commission evaluating the systems permitted under the pilot program established in this section. The report shall assess the effectiveness of these systems compared to the systems previously operated by the local government, sanitary district, or public authority, along with suggestions for further legislation and rulemaking necessary to support the adoption of highly treated wastewater systems.

“(e) The Commission for Public Health shall adopt temporary and permanent rules to provide for approval of treatment system applications for use in the State and create benefits for systems producing higher wastewater treatment levels that are proportional and graduated. These rules shall include, at a minimum, the following:

“(1) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for provisional wastewater systems, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(7), from manufacturers of wastewater systems with certification and listing for one or more years from a nationally recognized certification body, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(6), shall be approved within 45 days of receipt of a complete application. The proposed wastewater system listed in the application shall be identical in design and features to the wastewater system certified and listed by the nationally recognized certification body.

“(2) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for proposed wastewater systems without certification and listing from a nationally recognized certification body, as defined in G.S. 130A-343(a)(6), shall be approved as provisional and shall allow the issuance of a maximum of 200 improvement permits and authorizations for wastewater system construction.

“(3) Subject to the requirements of subdivision (4) of this subsection, applications for innovative status of a wastewater system shall be approved (i) after two years of certification and listing by a nationally recognized certification body and one year of field data in this State or other states or countries approved by DHHS or (ii) if not listed by a nationally recognized body, after completion of provisional status requirements in accordance with G.S. 130A-343(f). For systems receiving innovative status as a result of receiving national certification, those systems shall be identical to the system certified and listed by the nationally recognized certification body and identical to the systems installed in this State and approved by DHHS or other states or countries.

“(4) Applications for wastewater systems and dispersal products received after the effective date of this subsection shall demonstrate structural integrity, including subjecting the trench system to axle load of 16,000 pounds when covered with 12 inches of compacted soil and 4,000 pounds when covered with 6 inches of compacted soil without breakage, collapse, fracture, or compression that prevents the downline distribution of wastewater. Wastewater treatment devices with identifying surface or above grade access for operation and maintenance shall be excluded from load testing when installed and backfilled in accordance with the rules or the product approval.

“(5) Wastewater systems found by DHHS to meet standards for reclaimed water based on (i) field demonstrations over a two-year period in this State or other states approved by DHHS that the system meets reclaimed water standards or (ii) certification and listing by a nationally recognized body, such as the National Sanitation Foundation Standard 350, shall be approved for designs that eliminate repair area rules in Type I soils. Elimination of repair areas shall be considered for domestic strength wastewater only. Systems permitted without repair area under this subsection shall be classified by DHHS as a Type VI(b) system under DHHS rules and shall be inspected no less than 12 times per year.

“(6) Vertical and horizontal restrictions to property lines and limiting conditions for systems approved under this subsection shall be reduced proportionally to the graduated increases in wastewater quality.

“(f) The Commission for Public Health and the Department of Health and Human Services shall report quarterly on their implementation of subsection (d) of this section beginning no later than May 1, 2022, and shall continue quarterly reporting until rulemaking activities required by this section have been completed.

“(g) This section is effective when it becomes law. Funds allocated by this section that are not spent or encumbered by June 30, 2024, shall revert to the Wastewater Reserve to be used for any of the purposes authorized in

G.S. 159G-32(b)

.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-256.
Annual report.

By December 1 of each year, the Collaboratory shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on its activities in the prior fiscal year and any legislative recommendations.

History.

2021-180, s. 8.8(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.8, made this Article, as added by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8.8(b), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8.8(c), provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 116-256

, as enacted by this section, the North Carolina Collaboratory shall submit its report required by

G.S. 116-256

on its activities from the 2020-2021 fiscal year by February 1, 2022.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§§ 116-257 through 116-259.

Reserved for future codification purposes.